Utah statutes.
63A-3-108.   Designation of state officers and employees required to give
surety bonds -- Form of bonds -- Competitive bidding.
(1) (a)  The director of the Division of Finance shall designate the officers
and employees of the state who shall give surety bonds for the faithful
performance of their official duties.
(b)  The surety bonds shall be paid by the state and shall be in such form and
in such amounts and with such surety or sureties as the director requires.
(c)  The director may require that the surety bonds be obtained by competitive
bidding.
(2)  If the Legislature or the State Money Management Council determines that
certain officers and employees of the state furnish bond for the faithful
performance of their official duties and fixes the amount of these surety
bonds, the director of the Division of Finance shall determine only the form
and kind of sureties to be obtained.
